Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.525.164

Allotment of appropriations for school plant facilities—Duties of superintendent of public instruction.

In allotting the state funds provided by RCW 28A.525.162 through 28A.525.180, the superintendent of public instruction shall:

(1) Prescribe rules not inconsistent with RCW 28A.525.162 through 28A.525.180 governing the administration, control, terms, conditions, and disbursement of allotments to school districts to assist them in providing school plant facilities;

(2) Approve allotments to districts that apply for state assistance;

(3) Authorize the payment of approved allotments by warrant of the state treasurer; and

(4) In the event that the amount of state assistance applied for pursuant to the provisions hereof exceeds the funds available for such assistance during any biennium, make allotments on the basis of the urgency of need for school facilities in the districts that apply for assistance or prorate allotments among such districts in conformity with applicable rules.

[ 2006 c 263 s 310; 1990 c 33 s 456; 1989 c 321 s 2; 1974 ex.s. c 56 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 244 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.47.802, 28.47.802.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 28A.525.162.

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 244: See note following RCW 28A.525.162.